Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1119.
do enact as follows:AB1119,11Section 1. 704.07 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1119,3,32704.07 (4) Untenantability. If the premises become untenantable because 3of damage by fire, water, or other casualty or because of any condition hazardous to 4health, or if there is a substantial violation of sub. (2) materially affecting the 5health or safety of the tenant, the tenant may remove from the premises unless the 6landlord proceeds promptly to repair or rebuild or eliminate the health hazard or 7the substantial violation of sub. (2) materially affecting the health or safety of the 8tenant; or the tenant may remove if the inconvenience to the tenant by reason of the 9nature and period of repair, rebuilding, or elimination would impose undue 10hardship on the tenant. If the tenant remains in possession and the condition 11materially affects the health or safety of the tenant or substantially affects the use 12and occupancy of the premises, rent abates to the extent the tenant is deprived of 13the full normal use of the premises in accordance with a rent abatement schedule 14promulgated under sub. (6), if available. This section does not authorize rent to be 15withheld in full, if the tenant remains in possession. If the tenant justifiably moves 16out under this subsection, the tenant is not liable for rent after the premises become 1untenantable and the landlord must repay any rent paid in advance apportioned to 2the period after the premises become untenantable. This subsection is inapplicable 3if the damage or condition is caused by negligence or improper use by the tenant.AB1119,24Section 2. 704.07 (6) of the statutes is created to read:AB1119,3,85704.07 (6) Rent abatement schedule. The department of agriculture, trade 6and consumer protection shall promulgate, by rule, a rent abatement schedule that 7specifies items for which a tenant is entitled to rent abatement and the amount of 8rent abatement for each item.AB1119,39Section 3. 704.45 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1119,3,1110704.45 (1) (c) Exercising a legal right relating to residential tenancies, 11including the reasonable abatement of rent.AB1119,412Section 4. 704.45 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:AB1119,3,1713704.45 (1m) If a landlord in a residential tenancy increases rent, decreases 14services, brings an action for possession of the premises, refuses to renew a lease, or 15threatens any of the foregoing, such action shall be presumed to be a prohibited 16retaliatory action under sub. (1) if the tenant has taken any of the actions described 17in sub. (1) (a) to (c) in the preceding 12 months.AB1119,518Section 5. 704.45 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1119,3,2119704.45 (2) Notwithstanding sub. (1), a landlord may bring an action for 20possession of the premises if the tenant has not paid rent other than a rent increase 21prohibited by sub. (1) or an abatement of rent under s. 704.07.AB1119,3,2222